Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.200

Filing of articles of amendment—Procedure.

The articles of amendment shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4110; 1982 c 35 s 131; 1981 c 302 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 40.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.